South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3240.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 19, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-19-75.  A school district trustee may not delegate his authority or appoint a proxy to vote or otherwise act for the member. Any action taken by delegation or proxy of a board member is null and void ab initio. A school district trustee who delegates his authority as a trustee or appoints a proxy to vote or otherwise act for him is subject to removal by the Governor pursuant to Section 59-19-60. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----